NLP - Project/maithili/maithili-val.dix
	<pardef n = "ladZikabe">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "rajave">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "Karcave">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "kaviye">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "axamiye">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "sonarave">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "sawruve">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "allUbe">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "kuvazve">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "gehuzve">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "kroXave/kroXavahi/kroXavahiz">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "suwave">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "gosaiMyahi">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>Msaba</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "sarisoMbe">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "Garavo">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "ladZikavo">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "rajavo">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "Karcavo">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "kaviyo">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "axamiyo">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	<pardef n = "sonaravo">
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="d"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>saBa</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="o"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
